Utah statutes.
63G-2-601.   Rights of individuals on whom data is maintained -- Classification statement -- Notice to provider of information.

(1) (a)  Each governmental entity shall file with the state archivist a statement explaining the purposes for which a record series that is designated as private or controlled is collected and used by that governmental entity.

(b)  The statement filed under Subsection (1)(a) is a public record.

(2) (a)  A governmental entity shall provide notice of the following to a person that is asked to furnish information that could be classified as a private or controlled record:

(i)  the reasons the person is asked to furnish the information;

(ii)  the intended uses of the information;

(iii)  the consequences for refusing to provide the information; and

(iv)  the classes of persons and the governmental entities that currently:

(A)  share the information with the governmental entity; or

(B)  receive the information from the governmental entity on a regular or contractual basis.

(b)  The notice shall be:

(i)  posted in a prominent place at all locations where the governmental entity collects the information; or

(ii)  included as part of the documents or forms that are used by the governmental entity to collect the information.

(3)  Upon request, each governmental entity shall explain to a person:

(a)  the reasons the person is asked to furnish information that could be classified as a private or controlled record;

(b)  the intended uses of the information referred to in Subsection (3)(a);

(c)  the consequences for refusing to provide the information referred to in Subsection (3)(a); and

(d)  the reasons and circumstances under which the information referred to in Subsection (3)(a) may be shared with or provided to other persons or governmental entities.

(4)  A governmental entity may use private or controlled records only for those purposes:

(a)  given in the statement filed with the state archivist under Subsection (1); or

(b)  for which another governmental entity may use the record under Section 63G-2-206.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

